Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Chapter 11

Weighing of Coal and Minerals

59-11-101. Checkweigher or checkmeasurer — Duties — Interference prohibited — Penalty.

At every coal or other mine in this state, where coal or other minerals are mined by weight or measure, the miners, or a majority of those present at a meeting called for that purpose, shall have the right to employ a competent person as checkweigher or checkmeasurer, as the case may require, who shall be permitted at all times to be present at the weighing or measuring of coal, and who shall have power to weigh or measure the same, and, during the regular working hours, have the privilege to balance and examine the scales or measure the cars; provided, that all such balancing and examination of scales shall only be done in such way and in such time as in no way to interfere with the regular working of the mines; and such person shall not be considered a trespasser during working hours while attending to the interest of such person's employers, and in no manner shall such person be interfered with or intimidated by any person, agent, or owner, or miner.

Any person violating this section is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1887, ch. 206, § 1; Shan., § 339; Code 1932, § 5639; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-1601; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mines and Minerals, § 4.

59-11-102. Recordkeeping — Disputes — Settlement.

It shall be a further duty of such checkweigher or checkmeasurer to credit each miner with all merchantable coal or other mineral mined by the miner, on a proper sheet or book kept by such person for that purpose. When differences arise between the checkweigher or checkmeasurer and the agent or owners of the mine, as to the uniformity, capacity of scales or cars used, the same shall be referred to the mine inspector of the district where the mine is located, whose duty it shall be to regulate the same at once; and, in the event of such scales or cars proving to be correct, then the party or parties applying for the testing thereof shall pay all costs and expenses thereof; but, if not correct, then the owner or owners of the mine to pay the cost and charges of making the examination.

Acts 1887, ch. 206, § 2; Shan., § 340; Code 1932, § 5640; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-1602.

59-11-103. Improper weighing or measuring — Penalty.

Any weigher, agent, or checkmeasurer, whether employed by operators or miners, who knowingly or willfully adopts or takes more or less pounds for a bushel or ton than is provided by law, or willfully neglects the balancing or examining of the scales or cars, or knowingly and willfully weighs coal with an incorrect scale, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1887, ch. 206, § 3; Shan., § 341; Code 1932, § 5641; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-1603; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

59-11-104. Payment of checkweigher.

When miners of coal or other minerals in this state elect a checkweigher or measurer, as provided, the operators, company, or firm employing the miners shall, upon receiving notice in writing from the miners of the election of checkweigher, withhold from each miner an equal amount, agreed upon by the miners and checkweigher, and pay the same to the checkweigher at each regular payday.

Acts 1899, ch. 338, § 1; Shan., § 341a1; Code 1932, § 5642; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-1604.

59-11-105. Failure to withhold wages — Liability — Penalty.

Upon failure of any operator, company or firm to comply with §59-11-104, the operator, company or firm is liable to the checkweigher for the full amount of the checkweigher's wages, and is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1899, ch. 338, § 2; Shan., § 341a2; Code 1932, § 5643; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-1605; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.